Massachusetts, session 194th, S1567.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6 of Chapter 270 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding
the following definition to Subsection (a): -
“Adult-Only Retail Tobacco Store”, an establishment that is not required to possess a
retail food permit whose primary purpose is to sell or offer for sale but not for resale, tobacco
products and tobacco paraphernalia, in which the sale of other products or offer of services is
merely incidental, and in which the entry of persons under the minimum legal sales age is
prohibited at all times, and which maintains all municipal and state permits required for the retail
sale of tobacco products.
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 6 of Chapter 270 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding
the following subsection at the end thereof: -
(f) No manufacturer or retailer shall sell, distribute, or cause to be distributed a tobacco
product to a consumer, except in an adult-only retail tobacco store or in a smoking bar, as
defined in Section 22 of Chapter 270 of the General Laws.
SECTION 3. Nothing in this law shall preempt the stricter regulation of the sale or
distribution of tobacco products or smoking bars by the Commonwealth and any of its political
subdivision.
of 2